Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-812
Statewide general election; official ballot; form.

The form of the official ballot at the statewide general election shall be prescribed by the Secretary of State. At the top of the ballot for general elections and over all else shall be printed in boldface type the words Official Ballot, General Election, November ........., 20.... . Each division containing the names of the office and a list of candidates nominated for such office shall be separated from other groups by a bold line. The ballot shall list at-large candidates and subdistrict candidates under appropriate headings.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 233;

Laws 2004, LB 813, § 15.